Arkansas, session 2025, SB231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-115-205 is amended to read as follows:
23-115-205. Office of the Arkansas Lottery powers.
(a) The Office of the Arkansas Lottery has all powers necessary or
convenient to its usefulness in carrying out this chapter that are not in
conflict with the Arkansas Constitution or the United States Constitution,
including without limitation the following powers:
(1) To adopt and alter a seal;
(2) To adopt, amend, and repeal rules for the regulation of its
affairs and the conduct of its business, to prescribe the duties of officers
and employees of the office, and to perform other matters as the office
determines;
(3) To bring suits to enforce demands of the state under this
chapter;
(4) To procure or to provide insurance;
(5) To hold copyrights, trademarks, and service marks and to
*CRH148*
02-26-2025 14:40:40 CRH148

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 S2/26/25 SB231
enforce the office's rights with respect to those copyrights, trademarks, and
service marks;
(6) To initiate, supervise, and administer the operation of
lotteries in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted under this
chapter;
(7) To enter into written agreements with one (1) or more other
states or sovereigns for the operation, participation in marketing, and
promotion of multistate or multisovereign games;
(8) To conduct market research as necessary or appropriate;
(9) To acquire or lease real property and make improvements to
the real property and acquire by lease or by purchase personal property,
including without limitation:
(A) Computers;
(B) Mechanical, electronic, and online equipment and
terminals;
(C) Intangible property, including without limitation
computer programs, computer systems, and computer software; and
(D) Broadcast equipment;
(10) To administer oaths, take depositions, issue subpoenas, and
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers,
documents, and other evidence relative to any investigation or proceeding
conducted by the office;
(11) To employ an internal auditor to perform the duties and
responsibilities required under § 23-115-212;
(12) To select and contract with vendors;
(13) To select and license retailers;
(14) To enter into contracts or agreements with state or local
law enforcement agencies for the performance of law enforcement, background
investigations, and security checks;
(15) To conduct background investigations and, if considered
necessary by the Director of the Office of the Arkansas Lottery, credit
investigations on each potential vendor and retailer;
(16) To supervise ticket or share validation and lottery
drawings;
(17) To inspect at times determined solely by the office the
facilities of a vendor or a retailer to determine:
02-26-2025 14:40:40 CRH148

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 S2/26/25 SB231
(A) The integrity of the vendor's product or the
operations of the retailer; and
(B) Whether the vendor or the retailer is in compliance
with its contract or license;
(18) To report any suspected violation of this chapter to the
appropriate prosecuting attorney or the Attorney General and to any law
enforcement agencies having jurisdiction over the violation;
(19) Upon request, to provide assistance to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, the Legislative Auditor, the appropriate prosecuting
attorney, the Attorney General, or a law enforcement agency investigating a
violation of this chapter;
(20) To enter into contracts of terms and conditions that the
office determines;
(21) To establish and maintain banking relationships associated
with the maintenance and investment of lottery proceeds, including without
limitation the establishment of checking and savings accounts and trust
funds;
(22)(A) To advertise and promote lotteries and scholarships and
grants funded by net proceeds.
(B) The office shall seek the advice of the Division of
Higher Education when advertising to promote scholarships and grants funded
by net proceeds;
(23) To act as a retailer and to establish and operate a sales
facility to conduct promotions that involve the sale of tickets or shares and
any related merchandise;
(24)(A) To contract with one (1) or more independent testing
laboratories to scientifically test and technically evaluate lottery games,
lottery terminals, and lottery operating systems.
(B) An independent testing laboratory shall:
(i) Have a national reputation that is demonstrably
competent; and
(ii) Be qualified to scientifically test and evaluate
all components of a lottery game, lottery terminal, or lottery operating
system.
(C) An independent testing laboratory shall not be owned
or controlled by a vendor or a retailer;
02-26-2025 14:40:40 CRH148

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 S2/26/25 SB231
(25) To withhold state and federal income taxes as required by
law; and
(26) To adopt and amend rules necessary to carry out and
implement the office's powers and duties, organize and operate the office,
regulate the conduct of lotteries in general, and any other matters necessary
or desirable for the efficient and effective operation of lotteries for the
convenience of the public.
(b) The powers enumerated in subsection (a) of this section:
(1) Are in addition to those powers of the office enumerated
elsewhere in this chapter; and
(2) Do not limit or restrict any other powers of the office.
(c) The office is responsible for maintaining the integrity of the
lottery.
(d) The director shall:
(1) Assign personnel as agents of the office to conduct
investigations related to violations of lottery-related laws or lottery-
related administrative rules; and
(2) Report on the investigations conducted under subdivision
(d)(1) of this section on a regular basis to the office of the Attorney
General and the Division of Arkansas State Police.
(e) Personnel assigned as agents of the office shall:
(1) Be considered law enforcement officers by the Arkansas
Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training pursuant to § 12-9-101
et seq.; and
(2) Have statewide law enforcement authority to conduct
investigations related to violations of lottery-related laws or lottery-
related administrative rules.

/s/J. Dotson







02-26-2025 14:40:40 CRH148